New Jersey, session 221, A2403.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    An emergency medical services provider who administers an opioid antidote or provides other emergency treatment to a person experiencing a drug overdose shall provide information regarding that person, as deemed appropriate by the Attorney General, to the Department of Law and Public Safety.  The information shall be provided for the purpose of informing the person who experienced the overdose about harm reduction strategies and available recovery resources in order to reduce the imminent threat to the health and safety of that person. As used in this section emergency medical services provider means any association, organization, company, department, agency, service, program, unit, or other entity that provides pre-hospital emergency care to patients in New Jersey, including, but not limited to, a basic life support ambulance service, a mobile intensive care program or mobile intensive care unit, an air medical service, or a volunteer or non-volunteer first aid, rescue and ambulance squad. 2.    The Attorney General, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health, shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month after enactment.